Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB215.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 154.26-050 is amended to read as follows:
No director or officer of the authority shall be subject to any personal liability or
accountability by reason of his or her execution of any obligation duly authorized by the
authority.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/17/2025 1:00 PM Jacketed